Nevada, session 83, AB7.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62B.600 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62B.600 1. The Juvenile Justice Oversight Commission is
hereby established.
2. The Commission consists of the Governor or his or her
designee and [25] members appointed by the Governor. The
[Governor shall appoint to] membership of the Commission [:
(a) Two members nominated by the Senate, who are not
members of the Senate or public officers.
(b) Two members nominated by the Assembly, who are not
members of the Assembly or public officers.
(c) Two members nominated by the Supreme Court, who are not
judges, justices or public officers.
(d) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services or his or her designee.
(e) The Deputy Administrator of Juvenile Services of the
Division of Child and Family Services or his or her designee.
(f) Three members who are directors of juvenile services, one
each of whom must represent a county whose population:
(1) Is less than 100,000.
(2) Is 100,000 or more but less than 700,000.
(3) Is 700,000 or more.
(g) Two members who are district attorneys.
(h) Two members who are public defenders.
(i) One member who is a representative of a law enforcement
agency.
(j) Two members who are representatives of a nonprofit
organization which provides programs to prevent juvenile
delinquency.
(k) One member who is a volunteer who works with children
who have been adjudicated delinquent.
(l) Six members who are under the age of 24 years at the time of
appointment.] must comply with the requirements prescribed by 34
U.S.C. § 11133(a)(3)(A).
3. [At least three of the persons appointed to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 2 must be persons who are currently or were
formerly subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
4.] Each appointed member serves a term of [2] 4 years.
Members may be reappointed for additional terms of [2] 4 years in
the same manner as the original appointments. Any vacancy
occurring in the membership of the Commission must be filled in
the same manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days
-
*AB7*

– 3 –
after the vacancy occurs. [Nine of the initial members of the
Commission who are appointed pursuant to subsection 2 must be
appointed to an initial term of 1 year.] Each member of the
Commission continues in office until his or her successor is
appointed.
[5.] 4. The members of the Commission serve without
compensation but are entitled to receive the per diem allowance and
travel expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
[6.] 5. A majority of the members of the Commission
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority
of a quorum present at any meeting is sufficient for any official
action taken by the Commission.
[7.] 6. A member of the Commission who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must be
relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular compensation
to prepare for and attend meetings of the Commission and perform
any work necessary to carry out the duties of the Commission in the
most timely manner practicable. A state agency or political
subdivision of this State shall not require an officer or employee
who is a member of the Commission to:
(a) Make up the time he or she is absent from work to carry out
his or her duties as a member of the Commission; or
(b) Take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
[8.] 7. At the first meeting of the Commission and annually
thereafter:
(a) The Governor shall appoint a Chair of the Commission;
(b) The Commission shall elect a Secretary from among its
members; and
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules for its own management
and government.
[9.] 8. The Commission shall [:
(a) Hold its first meeting within 60 days after all the initial
appointments to the Commission are made pursuant to subsection 2;
and
(b) Meet] meet at least once every 4 months and may meet at
such further times as deemed necessary by the Chair.
[10. As used in this section, “public officer” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 205.4627.]
Sec. 2. 1. The terms of the members of the Juvenile Justice
Oversight Commission appointed pursuant to NRS 62B.600 who are
incumbent on October 1, 2025, expire on that date.
-
*AB7*

– 4 –
2. As soon as practicable on or after October 1, 2025, the
Governor shall appoint members to the Commission in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 62B.600, as amended by section 1 of
this act.
H
-
*AB7*